Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1930
Licensee; service of process.

Obtaining a license under sections 81-1901 to 81-1936 shall constitute sufficient contact with this state for the exercise of personal jurisdiction over such licensee in any action arising out of the licensee's activity in this state.

Laws 1980, LB 485, § 30;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 100.